New York, session 2025-2026, A368.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 201-g of the labor law is renum- 2 bered subdivision 5 and a new subdivision 3 is added to read as follows: 3 3. a. Each time an employer provides their employees with written 4 notice of such employer's sexual harassment prevention policy and infor- 5 mation presented at such employer's sexual harassment prevention train- 6 ing program, the employer shall obtain from the employee a signed and 7 dated electronic or written acknowledgement, in English and in the 8 primary language of the employee, of receipt of this notice, which the 9 employer shall preserve and maintain for six years. Such acknowledge- 10 ment shall include an affirmation by the employee that the employee 11 accurately identified their primary language to the employer, and that 12 the notice provided by the employer to such employee pursuant to this 13 subdivision was in the language so identified or if such notice is not 14 available from the commissioner in the employee's primary language, was 15 provided to the employee in English, and shall conform to any additional 16 requirements established by the commissioner with regard to content and 17 form. 18 b. Every employer shall notify their employees in writing of any 19 changes to such employer's sexual harassment prevention policy or to the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01378-02-6 A. 368--A 2 1 information presented in their sexual harassment prevention training 2 program, at least seven calendar days prior to the time of such changes. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 4 have become a law. Effective immediately the addition, amendment and/or 5 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 6 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 7 on or before such effective date.